Iowa, session 2025-2026, 1414XD.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA:
TLSB 1414XD (3) 91
sc/ns

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
Section 1. Section 9E.3, subsection 1, paragraphs e and f,
Code 2025, are amended to read as follows:
e. The residential address of the eligible person,
disclosure of which could lead to an increased risk of domestic
abuse, domestic abuse assault, sexual abuse, assault, stalking,
or human trafficking. If the eligible person’s residential
address is a shelter known to the program, the applicant may
provide the shelter’s name and other contact information in
lieu of the shelter’s physical address.
f. If mail cannot be delivered to the residential address of
the eligible person, the address to which mail can be sent to
the eligible person. If the eligible person’s mailing address
is a shelter known to the program, the applicant may provide
the shelter’s name and other contact information in lieu of the
shelter’s physical address.
Sec. 2. Section 9E.4, subsection 2, Code 2025, is amended
to read as follows:
2. The secretary shall cancel a program participant’s
certification if the for any of the following reasons:
a. The program participant’s application contains false
information.
b. The secretary receives information from a reliable source
that the program participant has died.
c. A program participant with legal documentation from a
reliable source requests an adult member of a household to be
removed from the program. An adult member of a household whose
program certification is canceled is eligible to rejoin the
program.
Sec. 3. Section 9E.5, subsection 3, Code 2025, is amended
to read as follows:
3. The secretary shall forward all mail sent to the
designated address to the program participant. At the request
of the program participant, the secretary may hold the program
participant’s mail for up to thirty days.
Sec. 4. Section 9E.6, subsection 1, Code 2025, is amended by
LSB 1414XD (3) 91
-1- sc/ns 1/3

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
adding the following new paragraph:
NEW PARAGRAPH. c. The state commissioner of elections
or a county commissioner of elections shall cancel a program
participant’s voter registration upon becoming aware of the
program participant’s voter registration in another state.
Sec. 5. Section 9E.6, subsection 2, paragraph a, Code 2025,
is amended to read as follows:
a. A program participant who is otherwise eligible to
vote may annually register with the state commissioner of
elections as an absentee voter for the length of a program
participant’s certification period. As soon as practicable
before each election, the state commissioner of elections shall
determine the precinct in which the residential address of the
program participant is located and shall request and receive
from the county commissioner of elections the ballot for that
precinct and shall forward the absentee ballot to the program
participant with the other materials for absentee balloting as
required of the county commissioner of elections by section
53.8.